North Carolina, session 2025, HB435.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Land Surveyor Intern Reenactment. – G.S. 89C-3(4) is reenacted as
it existed immediately before its repeal under Section 1(a) of S.L. 2022-1 and shall be recodified
as subdivision (4b) of that section to ensure the subdivisions of G.S. 89C-3 are listed in
alphabetical order and make any conforming changes in the General Statutes to reflect this
recodification.
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 89C-13(b)(1) is reenacted as it existed immediately before its
repeal under Section 1(b) of S.L. 2022-1.
SECTION 1.(c) Applicability. – This section is effective retroactively to July 1,
2022, and applies to certificates or licenses issued on or after that date.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 89C-3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 89C-3. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Chapter:
…
(7) Practice of land surveying. –
a. Providing professional services such as consultation, investigation,
testimony, evaluation, planning, mapping, assembling, and
interpreting reliable scientific measurements and information relative
to the location, size, shape, or physical features of the earth,
improvements on the earth, the space above the earth, or any part of
the earth, whether the gathering of information for the providing of
these services is accomplished by conventional ground measurements,
by aerial photography, by global positioning via satellites, or by a
combination of any of these methods, and the utilization and
development of these facts and interpretations into an orderly survey
map, plan, report, description, or project. The practice of land
surveying includes the following:
1. Locating, relocating, establishing, laying out, or retracing any
property line, easement, or boundary of any tract of land;
*H435-v-3*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2. Locating, relocating, establishing, or laying out the alignment
or elevation of any of the fixed works embraced within the
practice of professional engineering;
3. Making any survey for the subdivision of any tract of land,
including the topography, alignment and grades of streets and
incidental drainage within the subdivision, and the preparation
and perpetuation of maps, record plats, field note records, and
property descriptions that represent these surveys;
4. Determining, by the use of the principles of land surveying, the
position for any survey monument or reference point, or
setting, resetting, or replacing any survey monument or
reference point;
5. Determining the configuration or contour of the earth's surface
or the position of fixed objects on the earth's surface by
measuring lines and angles and applying the principles of
mathematics or photogrammetry;
6. Providing geodetic surveying which includes surveying for
determination of the size and shape of the earth both
horizontally and vertically and the precise positioning of points
on the earth utilizing angular and linear measurements through
spatially oriented spherical geometry; and
7. Creating, preparing, or modifying electronic or computerized
data, including land information systems and geographic
information systems relative to the performance of the practice
of land surveying.activities in sub-sub-subdivisions 1. through
6. of this sub-subdivision.
…."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 89C-13, as reenacted by Section 1(b) of this act, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 89C-13. General requirements for licensure.
(a) Engineer Intern. – To be certified as an engineer intern, an applicant shall (i) pass the
fundamentals of engineering examination and make application to the Board, (ii) be of good
character and reputation, (iii) submit three character references to the Board, one of whom is a
professional engineer, (iv) comply with the requirements of this Chapter, and (v) (iv) meet one
of the following requirements:
(1) Education. – Be a graduate of an EAC/ABET accredited engineering
curriculum or of a related science curriculum which has been approved by the
Board as being of satisfactory standing.
(2) Education and experience. – Be a graduate of an engineering curriculum or
related science curriculum of four years or more, other than curriculums
approved by the Board as being of satisfactory standing in subdivision (1) of
this subsection, and possess engineering experience satisfactory to the Board
with a specific record of four or more years of progressive experience on
engineering projects of a grade and character satisfactory to the Board.
…
(b) Land Surveyor Applicant. – The evaluation of a land surveyor applicant's
qualifications shall involve a consideration of the applicant's education, technical, and land
surveying experience, exhibits of land surveying projects with which the applicant has been
associated, and recommendations by references. The land surveyor applicant's qualifications may
be reviewed at an interview if the Board determines it necessary. Educational credit for institute
courses, correspondence courses, or other courses shall be determined by the Board.
Page 2 House Bill 435-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The following shall be considered as minimum evidence satisfactory to the Board that the
applicant is qualified for licensure as a professional land surveyor:surveyor or land surveyor
intern:
(1) To be certified as a land surveyor intern, an applicant shall (i) pass the
fundamentals of land surveying examination and make application to the
Board, (ii) be of good character and reputation, (iii) submit three character
references to the Board, one of whom is a professional land surveyor, (iv)
comply with the requirements of this Chapter, and (v) (iv) satisfy one of the
following requirements related to education and experience:
a. Be a graduate of a surveying curriculum of four years or more or other
equivalent curriculum in surveying approved by the Board.
b. Have rightful possession of an associate degree in surveying
technology approved by the Board, a record satisfactory to the Board
of four years of progressive practical experience, two years of which
shall have been under a practicing professional land surveyor, and
have satisfactorily passed a written and oral examination as required
by the Board.
c. Have graduated from high school or completed a high school
equivalency certificate with a record satisfactory to the Board of 10
years of progressive, practical experience, six years of which shall
have been under a practicing licensed land surveyor, and have
satisfactorily passed any oral and written examinations required by the
Board.
(1a) To be licensed as a professional land surveyor, an applicant shall (i) be of good
character and reputation, (ii) submit five character references to the Board,
three of whom are professional land surveyors or individuals acceptable to the
Board, with personal knowledge of the applicant's land surveying experience,
(iii) comply with the requirements of this Chapter, and (iv) meet one of the
following requirements:
…
h. Professional Engineers in Land Surveying. – Any person presently
licensed to practice professional engineering under this Chapter shall
upon application be licensed to practice land surveying, providing a
written application is filed with the Board within one year next after
June 19, 1975.
i. Photogrammetrists. – Any person presently practicing
photogrammetry with at least seven years of experience in the
profession, two or more of which shall have been in responsible charge
of photogrammetric mapping projects meeting National Map
Accuracy Standards shall, upon application, be licensed to practice
land surveying, provided:
1. The applicant submit certified proof of graduation from high
school, high school equivalency, or higher degree;
2. The applicant submit proof of employment in responsible
charge as a photogrammetrist practicing within the State of
North Carolina to include itemized reports detailing methods,
procedures, amount of applicant's personal involvement and
the name, address, and telephone numbers of the client for five
projects completed by the applicant with the State. A final map
for one of the five projects shall also be submitted;
House Bill 435-Third Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
3. Five references to the applicant's character and quality of work,
three of which shall be from professional land surveyors, are
submitted to the Board; and
4. The application is submitted to the Board by July 1, 1999. After
July 1, 1999, no photogrammetrist shall be licensed without
meeting the same requirements as to education, length of
experience, and testing required of all land surveying
applicants.
j. Any person performing activities described in G.S. 89C-3(7)a.2. and
7. with at least seven years of experience in performing mapping
science surveys, two or more of which have been in responsible charge
of mapping science projects that meet the requirements of 21 NCAC
56.1608, shall, upon application, be licensed to practice surveying in
their area of competence (mapping science) provided all of the
following requirements are met:
1. The applicant submits certified proof of graduation from high
school, high school equivalency, or higher degree.
2. The applicant submits proof of employment in responsible
charge of mapping science projects within the State of North
Carolina, including itemized reports detailing methods,
procedures, amount of applicant's personal involvement, and
the name, address, and telephone numbers of the client for five
projects completed by the applicant within the State. The
applicant shall also submit a final map, report, or digital
product for one of the five projects.
3. Five references as to the applicant's character and quality of
work, three of which shall be from professional land surveyors,
are submitted to the Board.
4. The application is submitted to the Board by July 1, 2014. After
July 1, 2014, no individual performing surveys described in 21
NCAC 56.1608 shall be licensed without meeting the same
requirements as to education, length of experience, and testing
required of all land surveying applications.
(2) Repealed by Session Laws 2013-98, s. 2 effective June 12, 2013.
The Board shall require an applicant to submit exhibits, drawings, plats, or other tangible
evidence of land surveying work executed by the applicant under proper supervision and which
the applicant has personally accomplished or supervised.
Land surveying encompasses a number of disciplines including geodetic surveying,
hydrographic surveying, cadastral surveying, engineering surveying, route surveying,
photogrammetric (aerial) surveying, and topographic surveying. A professional land surveyor
shall practice only within the surveyor's area of expertise.
The Board shall require an applicant to submit exhibits, drawings, plats, or other tangible
evidence of land surveying work executed by the applicant under proper supervision and which
the applicant has personally accomplished or supervised."
SECTION 2.(c) G.S. 89C-10 reads as rewritten:
"§ 89C-10. Board powers.
(a) Rulemaking Authority. – The Board may adopt and amend all rules and rules of
procedure as may be reasonably necessary for the proper performance of its duties, the regulation
of its procedures, meetings, records, the administration of examinations, and the authority to
enforce the rules of professional conduct as may be adopted by the Board pursuant to
G.S. 89C-20.
Page 4 House Bill 435-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
The action by the Board in carrying out any of the powers specified in this section shall be
binding upon all persons licensed under this Chapter, including corporations and business firms
holding certificates of authorization.
(b) Official Seal. – The Board shall adopt and have an official seal, which shall be affixed
to each certificate issued.
(c) Enforcement Through Injunctions. – The Board may in the name of the State apply
for relief, by injunction, in the established manner provided in cases of civil procedure, without
bond, to enforce the provisions of this Chapter, or to restrain any violation of the provisions of
this Chapter. In proceedings for injunctive relief, it shall not be necessary to allege or prove either
that an adequate remedy at law does not exist, or that substantial or irreparable damage would
result from the continued violation of the provisions of this Chapter. The members of the Board
shall not be personally liable under this proceeding. When the Board prevails in actions brought
under this subsection to enforce violations of G.S. 89C-23(a)(3), (4), (5), (6), or (8), and the court
finds that the violation was committed with fraudulent intent or intentional deceit, the court shall
award the Board (i) reasonable attorneys' fees not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) and
(ii) the costs associated with obtaining the relief, including costs associated with the investigation
and prosecution of the violation.
(d) Examinations. – The Board may subject an applicant for licensure to any examination
necessary to determine the applicant's qualifications.
(e) Issuance of Licenses. – The Board may issue an appropriate certificate of licensure to
any applicant who, in the opinion of the Board, has met the requirements of this Chapter.
(f) Investigations. – It shall be the responsibility and duty of the Board to conduct a
regular program of investigation concerning all matters within its jurisdiction under the
provisions of this Chapter. The investigation of a licensee is confidential until the Board issues a
citation to the licensee. The investigation of a nonlicensee is confidential until the Board approves
any action authorized under this Chapter against the nonlicensee. The Board may expend its
funds for salaries, fees, and per diem expenses, in connection with its investigations, provided
that no funds other than per diem expenses shall be paid to any member of the Board in
connection with its investigations, nor may any member of the Board give testimony and later sit
in deciding on any matter which may directly involve punitive action for the testimony.
(g) Instructional Programs. – The Board may use its funds to establish and conduct
instructional programs for persons who are currently licensed to practice engineering or land
surveying, as well as refresher courses for persons interested in obtaining adequate instruction or
programs of study to qualify them for licensure to practice engineering or land surveying. The
Board may expend its funds for these purposes and may not only conduct, sponsor, and arrange
for instructional programs, but also may carry out instructional programs through extension
courses or other media. The Board may enter into plans or agreements with community colleges,
public or private institutions of higher learning, State and county boards of education, or with the
governing authority of any industrial education center for the purpose of planning, scheduling or
arranging courses, instruction, extension courses, or in assisting in obtaining courses of study or
programs in the field of engineering and land surveying. The Board shall encourage the
educational institutions in this State to offer courses necessary to complete the educational
requirements of this Chapter. The Board may expend its funds to support nonprofit engineering
and surveying professional societies, as well as nonprofit foundations dedicated to advancing the
engineering and surveying professions, for the purposes of encouraging licensure and providing
continuing education to licensees. For the purpose of carrying out these objectives, the Board
may adopt rules as may be necessary for the educational programs, instruction, extension
services, or for entering into plans or contracts with persons or educational and industrial
institutions.
House Bill 435-Third Edition Page 5

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(g1) Continuing Education for Surveying Apprenticeships. – The Board shall review and
promulgate rules establishing continuing education requirements for surveying apprenticeships
and encourage the workforce development of the profession.
(h) Licensing Sponsors of Competency Activities. – The Board may license sponsors of
continuing professional competency activities who agree to conduct programs in accordance with
standards adopted by the Board. Sponsors shall pay a license fee established by the Board, not to
exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) for licensure under this subsection. The license fee
shall accompany the application. Sponsors shall renew their licenses annually on a form provided
by the Board.
(i) Real Property Transactions. – The Board shall have the power to acquire, hold, rent,
encumber, alienate, and otherwise deal with real property in the same manner as a private person
or corporation, subject only to approval of the Governor and the Council of State. Collateral
pledged by the Board for an encumbrance is limited to the assets, income, and revenues of the
Board."
SECTION 2.(d) G.S. 89C-12 reads as rewritten:
"§ 89C-12. Records and reports of Board; evidence.
The Board shall keep a record of its proceedings and a register of all applicants for licensure,
showing for each the date of application, name, age, education, and other qualifications, place of
business and place of residence, whether the applicant was rejected or a certificate of licensure
granted, and the date licensure was rejected or granted. The books and register of the Board shall
be prima facie evidence of all matters recorded by the Board, and a copy duly certified by the
secretary of the Board under seal shall be admissible in evidence as if the original were produced.
A roster showing the names and places of business and of residence of all licensed professional
engineers and all licensed professional land surveyors shall be prepared by the secretary of the
Board current to the month of January of each year. published on the Board's website. On or
before the first day of May of each year, the Board shall submit to the Governor a report on its
transactions for the preceding year, and shall file with the Secretary of State a copy of the report,
together with a complete statement of the receipts and expenditures of the Board attested by the
chair and the secretary and a copy of the roster of licensed professional engineers and
professional land surveyors."
SECTION 2.(e) G.S. 89C-14 reads as rewritten:
"§ 89C-14. Application for licensure; license fees.
(a) Application Requirements. – Application for licensure as a professional engineer or
professional land surveyor shall be on a form prescribed and furnished by the Board. It shall
contain statements made under oath, showing the applicant's education and a detailed summary
of the applicant's technical and engineering or land surveying experience, and shall include the
names and complete mailing addresses of the references, none of whom may be immediate
members of the applicant's family or members of the Board.
The Board may accept the certified information on the copy of a current formal certificate of
qualifications issued by the National Council of Examiners for Engineering and Surveying in
lieu of the same information that is required for the form prescribed and furnished by the Board.
(b) Examination and Licensure Fees. – An applicant for licensure who is required to take
the written examination shall pay to the Board an application fee not to exceed one hundred
dollars ($100.00). The Board may charge any fee necessary to defray the cost of any required
examinations. The fee shall accompany the application. The fee for comity licensure of engineers
and land surveyors who hold unexpired certificates in another state or a territory of the United
States or in Canada shall be the total current fee as fixed by the Board.
(c) Certification Fees for Corporations and Firms. – The certification fee for a corporation
is the amount set by the Board but shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00). The fee shall
accompany the application. The certification fee for a business firm is the same as the fee for a
corporation. The fee for renewal of a certificate of licensure of a corporation is the amount set by
Page 6 House Bill 435-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
the Board but shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00). The fee for renewal of a certificate
of licensure for a business firm is the same as the renewal fee for a corporation.
(d) Refunds for Denied Licensure. – Should the Board deny the issuance of a certificate
of licensure to any applicant, the unobligated portion of fees paid shall be returned by the Board
to the applicant.
(e) A candidate failing an examination may apply, and be considered by the Board, for
reexamination at the end of six months. The Board shall make such reexamination charge as is
necessary to defray the cost of the examination.
A candidate with a combination of three failures or unexcused absences on an examination
shall only be eligible after submitting a new application with appropriate application fee and
documented evidence of actions taken by the candidate to enhance the candidate's prospects for
passing the exam. A candidate with a combination of three failures or unexcused absences may
only be considered by the Board for reexamination at the end of 12 months following the third
failure or unexcused absence. After the end of the 12-month period, the applicant may take the
examination no more than once every calendar year."
SECTION 2.(f) G.S. 89C-16 reads as rewritten:
"§ 89C-16. Certificates of licensure; effect; seals.
(a) Certificate Issuance and Designation. – The Board shall issue to any applicant, who,
in the opinion of the Board, has met the requirements of this Chapter, a certificate of licensure
giving the licensee proper authority to practice the profession in this State. The certificate of
licensure for a professional engineer shall carry the designation "professional engineer," and for
a land surveyor, "professional land surveyor," shall give the full name of the licensee with the
Board designated licensure number and shall be signed by the chair and the secretary under the
seal of the Board.
(b) Certificate as Evidence of Authority. – This certificate shall be prima facie evidence
that the person named on the certificate is entitled to all rights, privileges and responsibilities of
a professional engineer or a professional land surveyor, while the certificate of licensure remains
unrevoked or unexpired.
(c) Seal Requirements and Prohibited Uses. – Each licensee shall upon licensure obtain
a seal of a design authorized by the Board bearing the licensee's name, license number, and the
legend, "professional engineer," or "professional land surveyor." Final drawings, specifications,
plans and reports prepared by a licensee shall, when issued, be certified and stamped with the
seal or facsimile of the seal unless the licensee is exempt under the provisions of G.S. 89C-25(7).
seal. It shall be unlawful for a licensee to affix, or permit the licensee's seal and signature or
facsimile of the seal and signature to be affixed to any drawings, specifications, plans or reports
after the expiration of a certificate or for the purpose of aiding or abetting any other person to
evade or attempt to evade any provision of this Chapter. A professional engineer practicing land
surveying shall use the licensee's land surveyor seal."
SECTION 2.(g) G.S. 89C-17 reads as rewritten:
"§ 89C-17. Expirations and renewals of certificates.licenses.
(a) Certificates for licensure of corporations and Expiration of Licenses. – Licenses of
individuals, corporations, or business firms that engage engaged in the practice of engineering or
land surveying shall expire on the last day of the month of June following their issuance or
renewal date chosen by the Board and shall become invalid on that date unless renewed. All other
certificates for licensure shall expire on the last day of the month of December next following
their issuance or renewal, and shall become invalid on that date unless renewed. When necessary
to protect the public health, safety, or welfare, the Board shall require any evidence necessary to
establish the continuing competency of engineers and land surveyors as a condition of renewal
of licenses. When the Board is satisfied as to the continuing competency of an applicant, it shall
issue a renewal of the certificate upon payment by the applicant of a fee fixed by the Board but
not to exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00). The Board, by rule, may enact a multiyear renewal
House Bill 435-Third Edition Page 7

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
cycle. The secretary of the Board shall notify by mail or email every person or entity licensed
under this Chapter of the date of expiration expiration date of the certificate, license, the amount
of the fee required for its renewal for one year, renewal, and any requirement as to evidence of
continued professional competency. The notice shall be sent by email or mailed at least one
month in advance of the expiration date of the certificate.license.
(b) Renewal Process. – Renewal shall be effected may be accomplished at any time
during the month immediately following the month of expiration, by payment to the secretary of
the Board of a renewal fee, as determined by the Board, which shall not exceed seventy-five
dollars ($75.00).after issuance of the notice required under subsection (a) of this section and
through the end of the calendar month following the expiration date by complying with the
Board's requirements, including any professional competency requirements, as a condition of
renewal. The renewal fee shall be set by the Board but shall not exceed seventy-five dollars
($75.00) per calendar year of the renewal period.
(c) Consequences of Failure to Renew. – Failure on the part of any licensee to renew the
certificate annually in a license by the end of the calendar month immediately following the
month date of expiration, as required above, shall deprive the licensee of the right to practice
until reinstatement of the license. The license may be reinstated at anytime during the first 12
months immediately following the date the license became invalid by payment of of: (i) a
reinstatement fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) in addition to that shall be set by the Board
but shall not exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) and (ii) the established renewal fee. Failure
of a licensee to reinstate the license during the first 12 months immediately following the date
the license became invalid shall require the individual, person or entity, prior to resuming practice
in North Carolina, to submit an application on the prescribed form, and to meet all other
requirements for licensure as set forth in Chapter 89C. this Chapter. The secretary of the Board
is instructed to shall remove from the official roster of engineers and land surveyors the names
of all licensees who have not effected their renewal by the first day of the month immediately
following the renewal period.
(d) Renewals in Hardship Cases. – The Board may adopt rules to provide for renewals in
distress or hardship cases due to military service, prolonged illness, or prolonged absence from
the State, where the applicant for renewal demonstrates to the Board that the applicant has
maintained active knowledge and professional status as an engineer or land surveyor, as the case
may be.
(e) Notification of Address Changes. – It shall be the responsibility of each licensee to
inform the Board promptly concerning change in any changes to their business or residential
address.
(f) Notification of Business Changes. – It shall be the responsibility of each licensed
business firm and corporation to inform the Board promptly concerning any changes to their
business name, address, locations, ownership, officers, or services being offered.
(g) Inactive License Status. – A licensee may request and be granted inactive status. No
inactive licensee may practice in this State unless otherwise exempted in this Chapter. A licensee
granted inactive status shall pay annual the required renewal fees fee but shall not be subject to
annual continuing professional competency requirements. A licensee granted inactive status may
return to active status by meeting all requirements of the Board, including demonstration of
continuing professional competency as a condition of reinstatement."
SECTION 2.(h) G.S. 89C-23 reads as rewritten:
"§ 89C-23. Unlawful to practice engineering or land surveying without licensure; unlawful
use of title or terms; penalties; Attorney General to be legal adviser.
(a) Any person who shall practice, who commits any of the following acts, in addition to
being subject to the injunctive procedures in G.S. 89C-10(c), shall be guilty of a Class 2
misdemeanor:
Page 8 House Bill 435-Third Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Practicing or offer offering to practice, engineering or land surveying in this
State without first being licensed in accordance with the provisions of this
Chapter, or any person, firm, partnership, organization, association,
corporation, or other entity using Chapter.
(2) Using or employing the words "engineer" or "engineering" or "professional
engineer" or "professional engineering" or "land surveyor" or "land
surveying," or any modification or derivative of those words in its name or
form of business or activity by any person, firm, partnership, organization,
association, corporation, or other entity except as licensed under this Chapter
or in pursuit of activities exempted by this Chapter, or any person presenting
Chapter.
(3) Presenting or attempting to use the certificate of licensure or the seal of
another, or any person who shall give any another.
(4) Providing false or forged evidence of any kind to the Board or to any member
of the Board in obtaining or attempting to obtain a certificate of licensure, or
any person who shall falsely impersonate licensure.
(5) Falsely impersonating any other licensee of like or different name, or any
person who shall attempt name.
(6) Attempting to use an expired or revoked or nonexistent certificate of licensure,
or who shall practice licensure.
(7) Practicing or offer offering to practice when not qualified, or any person who
falsely claims qualified.
(8) Falsely claiming that the person is registered under this Chapter, or any person
who shall violate Chapter.
(9) Violating any of the provisions of this Chapter, in addition to injunctive
procedures set out hereinbefore, shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. In
no event shall there be representation of or holding out to the public of any
engineering expertise by unlicensed persons. Chapter.
(b) In no event shall any unlicensed person represent themselves as a professional
engineer or a professional land surveyor or hold out to the public any engineering or land
surveying expertise with the intent to practice engineering or land surveying. This prohibition
shall not apply to activities described in G.S. 89C-25.
(c) It shall be the duty of all duly constituted officers of the State and all political
subdivisions of the State to enforce the provisions of this Chapter and to prosecute any persons
violating them.
(d) The Attorney General of the State or an assistant shall act as legal adviser to the Board
and render any legal assistance necessary to carry out the provisions of this Chapter. The Board
may employ counsel and necessary assistance to aid in the enforcement of this Chapter, and the
compensation and expenses for the assistance shall be paid from funds of the Board."
SECTION 2.(i) G.S. 89C-25 reads as rewritten:
"§ 89C-25. Limitations of Application of Chapter.
This Chapter shall not prevent the following activities:
…
(12) Testifying as a lay or expert witness at a deposition or trial as well as the
preparation and drafting of an expert report pursuant to G.S. 1A-1, Rule
26(b)(4)a.2. in preparation for testifying as an expert at a deposition or trial."
SECTION 2.(j) G.S. 89C-25.2 is repealed.
SECTION 3.(a) G.S. 89C-19.2 is repealed.
SECTION 3.(b) Article 22B of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 14-159.15. Limited right of entry by professional land surveyors.
House Bill 435-Third Edition Page 9

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms are defined as follows:
(1) Critical infrastructure. – As defined in 42 U.S.C. § 5195c.
(2) Landowner. – The owner, lessee, or occupant of a parcel of land.
(3) Practice of land surveying. – As defined in G.S. 89C-3.
(4) Professional land surveyor. – As defined in G.S. 89C-3. For purposes of this
section, this term includes any agents, employees, or personnel under the
supervision of a professional land surveyor.
(b) A professional land surveyor shall have the right to enter upon the lands of others, if
necessary to perform surveys for the practice of land surveying, including the location of property
corners, boundary lines, rights-of-way, and easements, and may carry with them their customary
equipment and vehicles. An entry by a professional land surveyor to perform the practice of land
surveying under this section shall not constitute trespass under this Article or Article 22A of this
Chapter and shall not cause the professional land surveyor to be subject to arrest or a civil action
by reason of the entry.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed as giving authority to a professional land
surveyor to destroy, injure, damage, or move anything on the lands of another without the written
permission of the landowner, and nothing in this section shall be construed as removing civil
liability for such damage.
(d) No professional land surveyor shall have a civil cause of action against a landowner
for personal injury or property damage incurred while on the land for purposes consistent with
those described in subsection (b) of this section, except when such damages and injury were
willfully or deliberately caused by the landowner.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed as giving authority to a professional land
surveyor to do the following:
(1) Enter lands traversed by an operating railroad or properties owned, held, used,
or operated by a railroad or their subsidiaries.
(2) Enter lands containing critical infrastructure."
SECTION 3.(c) This section applies to acts on or after its effective date.
SECTION 4. Rulemaking. – The Board of Examiners for Engineers and Surveyors
may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this act.
SECTION 5. Effective Date. – Sections 2 and 4 of this act become effective October
1, 2025. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 10 House Bill 435-Third Edition